Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.501 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 70 crossing over Winters Creek
approximately three (3) miles northeast of Bennington in Bryan
County shall be designated as the "Clyde and Grace Cook Memorial
Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.502 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and Blue Bell Road in Springer,
Carter County, shall be designated as the "Terry Walker Memorial
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 2

Interchange". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the interchange.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.503 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and State Highway 32 in
Marietta, Love County, shall be designated as the "Sheriff Marty
Grisham Memorial Interchange". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed at the interchange.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.504 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 283 crossing over Elm Fork Red River
north of Mangum in Greer County shall be designated as the "MoMM2
Arlon Francis Wetsel Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.505 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 325 beginning at the intersection
of Ellis Avenue in Boise City extending northwesterly to the
Oklahoma-New Mexico border in Cimmaron County shall be designated as
the "John Skelley Memorial Highway". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.506 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 169 beginning at the Double Creek
Bridge extending south to the county line between Nowata County and
Rogers County shall be designated as the "CPT David Ward Neely
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 3

Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.507 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and Flood Avenue in Cleveland
County shall be designated as the "Patrolman Mark Harris Memorial
Interchange". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the
intersection.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.508 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 18 about three and one-half (3 1/2)
miles south of Pawnee crossing over Camp Creek in Pawnee County
shall be designated as the "PV2 Earl Maggart Memorial Bridge". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.509 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 7 crossing over Little Beaver Creek
in Stephens County shall be designated as the "Captain Hunter Blaine
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.510 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 270 beginning at the intersection of
State Highway 2 extending west to the intersection of Shero-Austin
Road in Latimer County shall be designated as the "PFC William Tony
Brock Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 4

cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on
the highway.
SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.511 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on State Highway 1 crossing over Gaines Creek
southeast of Hartshorne in Latimer County shall be designated as the
"SFC Elijah Parish Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.512 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 75 beginning at the intersection of
State Highway 9 in Wetumka extending two (2) miles south in Hughes
County shall be designated as the "PFC Roy Leon Sheppard USMC
Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
highway.
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.513 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge over Skull Creek on State Highway 16 near Slick in
Creek County shall be designated as the "Robert L. Campbell Memorial
Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.514 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 34 beginning at the intersection of
East 970 Road, extending north to the intersection of East 940 Road
on the Custer County and Roger Mills County county line shall be
designated as the "SGT Bedford Lee Drinnon Memorial Highway". The
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 5

Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.515 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 7 beginning at the intersection of
U.S. Highway 69 extending west to South Greathouse Drive in Atoka,
Atoka County shall be designated as the "Pat Turner Memorial
Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.516 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 59 in Poteau beginning east of the
Cavanal Scenic Expressway and U.S. Highway 59 interchange extending
northeasterly to Beeler Street in LeFlore County shall be designated
as the "Former Mayor Jeff Shockley Memorial Highway". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.517 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 59 crossing over Coal Creek
approximately five (5) miles west of the U.S. Highway 59 and U.S.
Highway 271 intersection in LeFlore County shall be designated as
the "Theresa C. Redwine Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.518 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 75 on the north side of Atoka
crossing over Sand Creek in Atoka County shall be designated as the
"PHM1C Charles Douglas Turner Memorial Bridge". The Department of
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 6

Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.519 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 59 crossing over Shawnee Creek south
of Hodgen in LeFlore County shall be designated as the "Rick Ford
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.520 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 9 beginning west of Number 9 Marina
Road extending east to Piney Creek Road in Pittsburg County shall be
designated as the "Kerwin and Beulah Williams Memorial Highway".
The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent
markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.521 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 62 crossing over Hog Creek southwest
of Anadarko in Caddo County shall be designated as the "PFC Leonard
Cozad, Sr. WWII Kiowa Code Talker Memorial Bridge". The Department
of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing
that name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.522 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange at U.S. Highway 81 and Interstate 44 in
Chickasha in Grady County shall be designated as the "Stephen J.
LaForge Memorial Interchange". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed at the interchange.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 7

SECTION 23. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.523 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on Interstate 44 crossing over Sitting Bear Creek in
Lawton in Comanche County shall be designated as the "SSG Samuel
Pewewardy, Jr. Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed on the bridge.
SECTION 24. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.524 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of State Highway 11 beginning at County Road 2100
extending south to East 186th North, south of Avant in Osage County
shall be designated as the "PFC Justin Lambillotte Memorial
Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
SECTION 25. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.525 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of Interstate 35 and U.S. Highway 412 in Noble
County shall be designated as the "Kyle Whitehead Memorial
Interchange". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the interchange.
SECTION 26. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.526 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 81 beginning at Memorial Road
extending south to Hefner Road east of Concho in Canadian County
shall be designated as the "Harvey Pratt Memorial Highway". The
Department of Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers
bearing that name to be placed on the highway.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 8

SECTION 27. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.527 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The interchange of U.S. Highway 75 and State Highway 16 in
Okmulgee County shall be designated as the "Senator Frank Shurden
Interchange". The Department of Transportation shall cause suitable
permanent markers bearing that name to be placed at the interchange.
SECTION 28. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.528 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 62 beginning at North 4 Mile Road
and extending east to North 5 Mile Road east of Fort Gibson in
Muskogee County shall be designated as the "CPL Byran Radebaugh
Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
highway.
SECTION 29. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.529 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The section of U.S. Highway 70 beginning at the intersection of
Wheeler Road, extending east through Valliant to the intersection of
N 4490 Road in McCurtain County shall be designated as the "Harvey
Weathers, Jr. Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed on the highway.
SECTION 30. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.530 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 64 Business crossing over the
railroad in Muskogee, Muskogee County, shall be designated as the
"Charlie Randolph Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable markers bearing that name to be
placed on the bridge.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 9

SECTION 31. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.531 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The intersection of U.S. Highway 270 and U.S. Highway 64 north
of Beaver in Beaver County shall be designated as the "Dr. Pauline
Hodges Memorial Intersection". The Department of Transportation
shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be
placed on the bridge.
SECTION 32. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.532 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge on U.S. Highway 59 crossing over Poteau River north
of Heavener in LeFlore County shall be designated as the "Deputy
Sheriff Thomas "Walker" LeMay Memorial Bridge". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 33. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1698.356,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 1698.356. The bridge over the Fort Smith Stockyards on
U.S. Highway 64 west of the Oklahoma/Arkansas state line in Sequoyah
County shall be designated the "TSGT Wilmot E. Chamberlain WWII POW
Memorial Bridge". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
bridge.
SECTION 34. AMENDATORY Section 13, Chapter 484, O.S.L.
2025 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1698.487), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1698.487. The section of State Highway 95 beginning at
Four Corners County Road M and extending north for two (2) miles to
County Road K in Texas County shall be designated as the "Veronica
Butler and Jilian Kelley Memorial Highway". The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the highway.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 10

SECTION 35. AMENDATORY Section 21, Chapter 484, O.S.L.
2025 (69 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1698.495), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1698.495. The section of State U.S. Highway 8 64
beginning at the intersection of U.S. State Highway 64 8 South
extending north five (5) miles to the intersection of E190 Road near
Cherokee in Alfalfa County shall be designated as the "Buddy Murrell
Memorial Highway". The Department of Transportation shall cause
suitable permanent markers bearing that name to be placed on the
highway.
SECTION 36. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 11

Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1966 Page 12